Hawaii, session 2025, GM1416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. Section 185-1.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [4] §185-1.5 [■}•] Responsible agency. (a) The department
shall take measures for the prevention, control, and
extinguishment of wildland fires within forest reserves, public
hunting areas, wildlife and plant sanctuaries, and natural area
reserves and shall cooperate with established fire control
agencies of the counties and the federal government in
developing plans and programs and mutual aid agreements for
assistance for the prevention, control, and extinguishment of
fires on forest, grass, brush, and watershed lands not within
the department's fire protection responsibilities described
above.
(b) The department shall establish an independent program
relating to the prevention, control, and extinguishment of
wildland fires within forest reserves. The department may
2025-2884 SB223 CDl SMA-2.docx

Page 2 S.B. NO.
s-2
C.D. 1
perform fuel reduction on lands not set aside to the
department."
SECTION 2. Section 185-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
S "(b) The administrator shall have the power and duty to:
(1) Review and approve plans prepared by the managers;
(2) Establish procedures and guidelines for the
prevention, control, and extinguishment of fires
coming within the meaning of this chapter;
(3) Establish procedures, guidelines, and conditions for
the issuance of burning permits and for determining
periods when forest reserves, public hunting areas,
wildlife and plant sanctuaries, and natural area
reserves shall be closed;
(4) Close or partially close forest reserves, public
hunting areas, wildlife and plant sanctuaries, and
natural area reserves, by restricting certain
activities when necessary;
(5) Summon, when necessary, additional firefighting
assistance, equipment, supplies, and materials needed
to extinguish fires; [and]
2025-2884 SB223 CDl SMA-2.docx

Page 3 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(6) Do any act which the manager is empowered to perform
under this chapter[—]; and
(7) Establish and maintain facilities for the performance
of fire protection, fire prevention, pest control, and
forest and range protection and enhancement
activities."
PART II
SECTION 3. The state fire council may amend the state fire
code to require that every owner or other person having charge
of or control over any building, structure, or other premises or
any holder of an easement located in a hazardous fire area
shall:
(1) Maintain an effective firebreak by removing and
clearing flammable vegetation and combustible growth
from areas within thirty feet of the building,
structure, or premises; provided that single specimens
of trees, ornamental shrubbery, or similar plants used
as ground cover that do not rapidly transmit fire need
not be removed or cleared;
(2) Maintain an effective firebreak by removing and
clearing flammable vegetation and combustible growth
2025-2884 SB223 CDl SMA-2.docx 3

Page 4
S.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
from areas within one hundred feet of the building,
structure, or premises when hazardous conditions cause
a firebreak of thirty feet to be insufficient to
provide reasonable safety; provided that grass and
other vegetation located more than thirty feet from
buildings or structures and less than eighteen inches
in height above the ground need not be removed where
necessary to stabilize the soil and prevent erosion;
(3) Remove portions of trees that extend within ten feet
of any chimney outlet of the building or structure;
(4) Remove deadwood from trees adjacent to or overhanging
the building or structure; and
(5) Maintain the roof of the building or structure free of
leaves, needles, or other dead vegetative growth.
PART III
SECTION 4. (a) The department of land and natural
resources shall establish and implement a community fuels
reduction project to reduce hazardous wildfire fuels on state
lands, particularly on lands adjacent to communities. Where
feasible, the community fuels reduction project shall;
2025-2884 SB223 CDl SMA-2.docx 4

Page 5
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(1) Reduce hazardous wildfire fuels on the landscape that
threaten watersheds, communities, and critical public
infrastructure such as powerlines and communication
facilities;
(2) Create and maintain effective firebreaks along
undeveloped state properties that border a developed
parcel, including but not limited to schools and
residential and commercial properties, by removing and
clearing flammable vegetation and combustible growth
from areas within thirty feet of the developed parcel;
(3) Reduce flammable grasses on the landscape through
projects like managed grazing; and
(4) Provide water infrastructure for grazing and fire
suppression.
(b) The department of land and natural resources shall
submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days
prior to the convening of each regular session detailing the
progress made toward meeting the requirements of subsection (a).
SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,000,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
2025-2884 SB223 CDl SMA-2.docx

Page 6 S.B. NO.
^.2
C.D. 1
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the division of forestry and wildlife of the
department of land and natural resources' community fuels
reduction project to support wildfire prevention and hazardous
fuel reduction measures pursuant to section 4 of this Act.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 6. Beginning with fiscal year 2027-2028 and each
fiscal year thereafter, the department of land and natural
resources shall establish the community fuels reduction project
as a separate line item within the department's budget.
PART IV
SECTION 7. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-2884 SB223 CDl SMA-2.docx

223
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 8th day of July ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 223, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
190

SB No. 223, SD 2, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives